California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 the information and data that the department requests relating to household goods carriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19288.1.

Until the adoption of fees by the bureau pursuant to Section 19288, every household mover shall pay to the bureau the fees required pursuant to, and in the manner specified in, Sections 5003.1 and 5003.2 of the Public Utilities Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that the fees imposed by this section shall be equivalent to the fees collected by the Public Utilities Commission, and imposed pursuant to Sections 5003.1 and 5003.2 of the Public Utilities Code, as of September 1, 2017. The fees to be paid by household movers as specified in this section are in addition to the fee specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 19288.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19288.2.

(a) If a household mover is in default on the payment of the fees prescribed by this chapter for a period of 30 days or more, the bureau may suspend or revoke the household mover’s permit. The bureau shall estimate from all available information the gross operating revenue of that household mover, compute the fee for which the household mover is in default, and impose a penalty of 25 percent of that amount for failure, neglect, or refusal to report. In no event shall the amount of the penalty be less than one dollar ($1). Upon payment of the estimated fee and the penalty, the permit shall be reinstated.

(b) The bureau may grant a reasonable extension of the 30-day period to any household mover, upon written application of the household
 mover and showing of the necessity for the extension.

(c) Upon the revocation of any permit issued to a household mover subject to this chapter, all fees provided for by this chapter shall become due and payable immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19289.

(a) Any person who submits to the bureau a check for fees that is returned unpaid shall pay all subsequent required fees by cashier’s check or money order.

(b) Any person who submits to the bureau a check for fees that is returned unpaid shall be assessed an additional processing fee as determined by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19290.

(a) Permits issued under this chapter expire two years from the date of issuance. To renew a permit, a permittee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the chief, and continue to pay the fees prescribed in Sections 19288 and 19288.1. Notwithstanding Section 163.5, if a permittee fails to renew the permit before its expiration, a delinquency fee of 20 percent
 of the most recent fee paid to the bureau pursuant to Sections 19288 and 19288.1 shall be added to the amount due to the bureau at the next fee interval. If the renewal fee and delinquency fee are not paid within 90 days after expiration of a permit, the permittee shall be assessed an additional fee of 30 percent of the
 most recent fee paid to the bureau pursuant to Sections 19288 and 19288.1.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a permittee may renew an expired permit within two years after expiration of the permit by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the bureau, and paying all accrued fees.

(c) A permit that is not renewed within two years of its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued, but the holder of the expired permit may apply for and obtain a new permit as provided in this chapter, upon payment of all fees that
 accrued since the date the permit was last renewed.

(d) The bureau may impose conditions on any permit issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19292.

The employees, representatives, auditors, and inspectors of the bureau may, under its order or direction, inspect and examine any books, accounts, records, memoranda, documents, papers, and correspondence kept by any person, corporation, or person having direct or indirect control over a person or corporation subject to this chapter. A permittee’s failure to allow an inspection pursuant to this section is grounds for suspension or revocation of the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19293.

(a) The bureau may establish rules and regulations as it deems necessary to carry out this article.

(b) This section does not prohibit the imposition by any city, county, or city and county of any excise or license tax authorized under Division 2 (commencing with Section 6001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Operative Date [19294. - 19294.]

19294.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 8.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Horse Racing [19400. - 19668.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [19400. - 19419.9.]

19400.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Horse Racing Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

The intent of this chapter is to allow parimutuel wagering on horse races, while:

(a) Assuring protection of the public.

(b) Encouraging agriculture and the breeding of horses in this state.

(c) Providing for maximum expansion of horse racing opportunities in the public interest.

(d) Providing uniformity of regulation for each type of horse racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   (AB 2792)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.

“Association” means any person engaged in the conduct of a recognized horse race meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.5.

“Barrel race” means a horse race around a course with three barrels placed in a triangular pattern which may conform to the requirements of the Women’s Professional Rodeo Association. Two barrel racecourses may be run simultaneously in the form of a heat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19404.

(a) “Board” means the California Horse Racing Board within the Business and Consumer Services Agency.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 4.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

19405.

“Breakage” means the odd cents by which the amount payable on each dollar wagered exceeds a multiple of ten cents ($0.10).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19406.

(a) A “California-bred horse” is a foal dropped by a mare in California after being conceived in California and remaining in California until the foal is weaned.

(b) A “California-bred thoroughbred” is a horse dropped by a mare in California after being conceived in California, or any thoroughbred horse dropped by a mare in California if the mare remains in California to be next bred to a thoroughbred stallion standing in California. If the mare cannot be bred for two successive breeding seasons but remains in California during that period, her foal shall be considered to be a California-bred thoroughbred.

(c) A
 “California-bred quarter horse” is a quarter horse foal conceived in California by a stallion standing in California at the time of conception.

(d) A “California-bred standardbred horse” is a standardbred foal conceived by a stallion registered with the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program.

(e) A “California-bred Appaloosa horse” is a horse dropped by a mare in California after being conceived in California, or any Appaloosa horse dropped by a mare in California if the mare remains in California to be next bred to an Appaloosa stallion standing in California. If the mare cannot be bred for two successive breeding seasons but remains in California during that period, her foal shall be considered to be a California-bred Appaloosa horse.

(f) A “California-bred paint horse” is a registered paint horse foal
 conceived in California by a stallion standing in California at the time of the conception, or by a registered paint horse stallion.

(g) A “California-sired horse” is a thoroughbred that was conceived in California by a registered California stallion. A California-sired horse is only eligible for entry in races restricted to California-bred or California-sired horses and is not eligible for any breeder or owner awards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (AB 280)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19407.

“Charity days” means racing days granted to a licensed racing association for the purpose of contributing net proceeds from such days to charitable organizations. Charity days are part of a regular race meeting and do not constitute a separate meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19407.5.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the California Horse Racing Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19407.6.

“Foaling date” means the date the horse is dropped by a mare as stated on the papers of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 617, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19408.

“Fund” means the Fair and Exposition Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19408.1.

“Graded stake” means an international classification for major thoroughbred stakes races established in each country by its thoroughbred racing regulatory body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1043, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19408.2.

“Claiming race” means a race in which any horse entered therein may be claimed in conformity with the rules established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1043, Sec. 3.1.)
-------------------------------------------

19408.3.

“Stakes race” means a race for which owners of horses entered or engaged for the race contribute to a purse for which money or any other prize may be added, nominations to which close 72 hours or more before starting; or an invitational race or invitational handicap race for which owners do not conribute to the purse, but which is advertised in the regular stakes program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1043, Sec. 3.2.)
-------------------------------------------

19409.

A “standardbred horse” is any horse (including mare, gelding, colt and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the United States Trotting Association, including foreign horses meeting the requirements of the United States Trotting Association. For the purposes of this section, this definition shall also apply to the term “harness horse.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

19409.5.

“Harness horse racing” is that form of horseracing in which “standardbred horses” as defined in Section 19409 are harnessed to a sulky or similar vehicle, and are raced at either the trotting or pacing gait.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

19410.

“Inclosure” means all areas of the racing association’s or fair’s grounds and locations, as designated by the racing association or fair licensed to conduct a live racing meeting and approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 594, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19410.5.

(a) The “inclosure–restricted” is that part of the inclosure that is enclosed by a wall, fence, or other physical barrier, where admission is obtained only upon the presentation of authorized credentials.

(b) The “inclosure–public” means all other areas of the inclosure designated by a racing association, fair, or simulcast wagering facility and approved by the board to which the public is admitted for the purpose of wagering on horseraces.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 308, Sec. 3.   Effective August 26, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19410.7.

“Minisatellite wagering site” means a location where satellite wagering may be conducted, with the approval of the board, provided that the wagering occurs in an area that is restricted to those who are 21 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19410.8.

“Show jumping race” means a horse race, over obstacles made of artificial or natural material, which is shorter than a steeplechase course, and is run by horses for time with faults converted to time. Requirements and rules for a show jumping race may conform to the requirements and rules of the American Horse Shows Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19411.

“Parimutuel wagering” is a form of wagering in which bettors either purchase tickets of various denominations, or issue wagering instructions leading to the placement of wagers, on the outcome of one or more horse races. The association distributes the total wagers comprising each pool, less the amounts retained for purposes specified in this chapter, to winning bettors based on the official race results.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 198, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19411.1.

“Handle” means the aggregate contributions to parimutuel pools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19412.

(a) “Conventional parimutuel pool” means the total wagers under the parimutuel system on any horse or horses in a particular race to win, place, or show.

(b) “Exotic parimutuel pool” means the total wagers under the parimutuel system on the finishing position of two or more horses in a particular race, such as quinella or exacta wagers, or on horses to win two or more races, such as daily double wagers, pick six wagers, or on other wagers approved by the board.

(c) “Proposition parimutuel pool” means the total wagers under the parimutuel system on propositions approved by the board that are
 based on the results of a live thoroughbred horse, quarter horse,
 or harness horse race or races.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 50, Sec. 1.   (SB 721)   Effective June 25, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.

“Person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other association or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.1.

“Prohibited drug substance” is any drug substance, medication, or chemical, whether natural or synthetic, or a metabolite or analogue thereof, foreign to the horse, whose use is not expressly authorized by the board. This includes, but is not limited to, any substance determined to be a stimulant, depressant, local anesthetic, or narcotic, or any drug, regardless of how harmless or innocuous it might otherwise be, which could interfere with the detection of any prohibited drug. “Prohibited drug substance” includes any substance not approved for use in the United States, including, but not limited to, any drug or substance available in a country outside the United States, any controlled substance listed in Part 1308 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any substance the approval of which has been withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.2.

“Standardbred breeder” means the owner of the dam of a standardbred foal at the time the foal was conceived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.4.

“Registered California standardbred stallion” means a stallion that is registered with the United States Trotting Association and listed in the official California Standardbred Stallions Registry maintained by the California Horse Racing Board or its designee as provided for in Section 19566.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1148.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.5.

“Quarter horse” is any horse (including mare, gelding, colt and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the American Quarter Horse Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

19414.

“Quarter horse racing” means that form of horse racing in which the participating horses are “quarter horses,” as defined in Section 19413.5, and are ridden by jockeys in races over distances of not more than five and one-half furlongs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19414.5.

(a) “Racing days” are days on which a licensed racing association or fair is authorized by the board to conduct horse racing.

(b) “Racing weeks” are seven consecutive days during which a licensed racing association or fair is authorized by the board to conduct horse racing for a minimum of five racing days. The board, however, upon joint petition of the association or fair and the organization representing horsemen participating in the meeting of that association or fair, may authorize the conduct of horse racing for less than five racing days. Fractional racing weeks of four days or less may be authorized by the board at the beginning and end of any horse racing meeting. Fractional weeks may also be authorized during weeks containing holidays and during periods of overlap with thoroughbred meetings and fairs if the total number of weeks authorized by the board in any calendar year for each breed does not exceed the maximum annual allocation of racing weeks provided for in Article 6 (commencing with Section 19530). If a licensed racing association holds a split meeting, each part of the split meeting shall be deemed a horse racing meeting solely for the purposes of authorizing fractional racing weeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19415.5.

“Split meeting” means a meeting having two periods of racing separated by at least 45 days, one period which is no more than 18 consecutive weeks in length and the other period which is no less than four consecutive weeks in length. The “short period” of a split meeting is the period of lesser duration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

19415.8.

“Steeplechase race” means horse racing over obstacles made of natural or artificial material and includes both hurdle and timber races. Rules for a steeplechase race may conform to rules of the National Steeplechase and Hunt Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 234, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19416.

“Thoroughbred horse” is any horse (including mare, gelding, colt and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the Jockey Club of New York, including racing permits issued to foreign thoroughbred horses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19416.5.

“Appaloosa horse” is any horse (including mare, gelding, colt and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the Appaloosa Horse Club and approved by the Appaloosa Horse Club.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19416.6.

“Arabian horse” is any horse (including mare, gelding, colt, and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the Arabian Horse Registry of America, Inc.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19416.7.

“Paint horse” is any horse, including mare, gelding, colt, and filly, that meets the requirements of and is registered by the American Paint Horse Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1277, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19417.

“Thoroughbred racing” is the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is a “thoroughbred” (as herein defined), is mounted by a jockey and engages in races on the flat but does not include a steeplechase or hurdle race.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19417.5.

“Appaloosa racing” is the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is an Appaloosa horse, is mounted by a jockey, and engages in races on the flat over a distance of not less than one-quarter of a mile or more than four miles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19417.6.

“Arabian racing” is the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is an Arabian horse, is mounted by a jockey and engages in races on the flat over a distance of not less than one-quarter of a mile or more than four miles.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19417.7.

“Paint racing” is the form of horse racing in which each participating horse is a paint horse, is mounted by a jockey and engages in races on the flat over a distance of not less than 220 yards or more than four miles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19418.

(a) “Fair” or “state-designated fairground” for purposes of this chapter means the California Exposition and State Fair in the City of Sacramento, an organization described in subdivision (b) or (c), and those fairs specified in Sections 3102, 3103, and 3104 of the Food and Agricultural Code that are engaged now or in the future as associations in the conduct of a recognized horse racing meeting or otherwise participate in horse racing activities licensed or approved by the board.

(b) A nonprofit organization that holds an annual fair pursuant to Section 4163 of the Food and Agricultural Code may elect to be a member of the network of California fairs on terms and conditions mutually agreed upon by the Department of Food and Agriculture and the
 nonprofit organization.

(c) A joint powers agency that holds an annual fair pursuant to Section 4171 of the Food and Agricultural Code may elect to be a member of the network of California fairs on terms and conditions mutually agreed upon by the Department of Food and Agriculture and the joint powers agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19419.9.

The provisions of this chapter insofar as they are substantially the same as existing code provisions relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof, and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19418 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1577, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Administration and Enforcement [19420. - 19448.]

19420.

Jurisdiction and supervision over meetings in this State where horse races with wagering on their results are held or conducted, and over all persons or things having to do with the operation of such meetings, is vested in the California Horse Racing Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19421.

The board consists of seven members, appointed by the Governor.

Each member shall hold office for a term of four years, commencing at the expiration of the previous term.

The term of the members of the board in office on January 1, 1959, shall expire as follows: one member July 26, 1959, one member July 26, 1960, and one member July 26, 1961. The terms shall expire in the same relative order as to each member as the term for which he holds office on January 1, 1959.

The term of the members appointed pursuant to amendments made to this section during the 1977–1978 legislative session shall expire as follows: one on January 1, 1979 and one on January 1, 1982.

The term of the members appointed pursuant to amendments made to this section during the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature shall expire as follows: one on January 1, 1982, and one on January 1, 1984.

Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

Each member shall be eligible for reappointment in the discretion of the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1043, Sec. 7.2.)
-------------------------------------------

19422.

Each member of the board shall have been a resident of this State for two years next preceding his appointment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19423.

A person is disqualified from membership on the board if the person, the person’s spouse or any dependent child thereof:

(a) Holds a financial interest in any horse racing track.

(b) Holds a financial interest or position of management with any business entity which conducts parimutuel horse racing.

(c) Holds a financial interest in a management or concession contract with any business entity which conducts parimutuel horse racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19424.

No board member is disqualified from receiving a share of any purse awarded him as the result of any horse race as an owner of a horse or as a breeder of a California-bred horse.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19424.5.

In order to permit the full participation of horsemen and horsewomen who may be appointed to the board, the Legislature declares that the appointment of such persons is intended to represent and further the interests of horse owners and breeders pursuant to Section 19401, and that such representation and furtherance will ultimately serve the public interest. Accordingly the Legislature finds racehorse owners and breeders are tantamount to and constitute the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19425.

The members of the board shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day spent in attendance at meetings scheduled by the chairperson of the board for the purpose of fulfilling the duties of the board pursuant to this chapter, and shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any member of the board who is also a member of, and is entitled to receive the benefits from, the Legislators’ Retirement System may elect to forego the compensation provided by this section and, if the compensation is foregone, the member shall not have his or her retirement benefits reduced and shall not be required to be reinstated into the retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 942, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19426.

The Governor may remove any board member for incompetence, neglect of duty or corruption upon first giving him a copy of the charges against him and an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

19427.

The board shall appoint such employees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19428.

The board shall appoint an executive director who shall receive the annual salary established by the board and approved by the Department of Human Resources. The executive director shall be the board’s executive officer and shall carry out and execute the duties as specified by law and by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 4.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19429.

A person is disqualified from employment by the board if the person, the person’s spouse, or any dependent child thereof:

(a) Holds a financial interest in a horserace track.

(b) Holds a financial interest or position of management with an entity that conducts parimutuel horseracing.

(c) Holds a financial interest in a management or concession contract with a business entity that conducts parimutuel horseracing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1080.)
-------------------------------------------

19430.

The salaries of the executive director, and other employees of the board, the per diem allowance of members of the board, and the necessary traveling and other expenses of the executive director and members of the board, shall be paid monthly by the Treasurer on the warrant of the Controller and the certification of the chairperson of the board out of the money appropriated for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19431.

(a) The board shall establish and maintain a general office for the transaction of its business in Sacramento. The board may establish any branch office for the transaction of its business at a place to be determined by it, and may hold meetings at any other place within the state when the interests of the public may be better served.

(b) A public record of every vote shall be maintained at the board’s general office and posted on the board’s internet website.

(c) At least four members of the board shall concur in the taking of any official action or in the exercise of any of the board’s duties, powers, or functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   (AB 1587)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19431.5.

The board shall publish, on a weekly basis on its internet website, all racehorse fatalities related to racing or training that occur within a licensed inclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 252, Sec. 2.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19432.

The executive director shall keep a full and true record of all proceedings of the board, preserve at the board’s general office all books, documents, and papers of the board, prepare for service such notices and other papers as may be required of him or her by the board, and perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19433.

The board may visit, investigate, and place expert accountants and such other persons as it may deem necessary in the office, track, or other place of business of any licensee for the purpose of satisfying itself that its rules and regulations are strictly complied with.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19434.

The board may require that the books and financial or other statements of any person licensed under this chapter shall be kept in any manner which to the board may seem best.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19435.

The board, its executive director, or the stewards, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the production of any records, books, memoranda, documents, or other papers or things, as is necessary to enable any of them to effectually discharge their duties, and may administer oaths or affirmations as necessary in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19436.

Any person subpoenaed who fails to appear at the time and place specified in answer to the subpoena and to bring any papers or things specified in the subpoena, or who upon such appearance, refuses to testify, or produce such records or things, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1835.)
-------------------------------------------

19437.

Any person who testifies falsely under oath in any proceeding before, or any investigation by the board, its executive director, or the stewards, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished in the same manner prescribed by the Penal Code for the punishment of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19438.

All civil process in actions brought against the executive director or the board and all subpoenas for the production of board records shall be served upon the executive director or their designated representative at the board’s headquarters in Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (AB 1768)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19439.

In lieu of requiring an affidavit or other sworn statement in any application or other paper or document required to be filed with it, the board may require a certification thereof under the penalty of perjury, in such form as the board may prescribe.

Any person who willfully makes and subscribes any such certificate which is materially false in any particular is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished in the manner prescribed by the Penal Code for the punishment of perjury.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19440.

(a) The board shall have all powers necessary and proper to enable it to carry out fully and effectually the purposes of this chapter. Responsibilities of the board shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Adopting rules and regulations that protect and advance the health, safety, welfare, and aftercare of racehorses.

(2) Adopting rules and regulations for the protection of the public and the control of horse racing and parimutuel wagering.

(3) Administration and enforcement of all laws, rules, and regulations affecting horse racing and parimutuel wagering.

(4) Adjudication of controversies arising from the enforcement of those laws and regulations dealing with horse racing and parimutuel wagering.

(5) Licensing of each racing association and all persons, other than the public at large, who participate in a horse racing meeting with parimutuel wagering.

(6) Allocation of racing dates to qualified associations in accordance with law.

(b) The board may delegate to stewards appointed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 19510) any of its powers and duties that are necessary to carry out fully and effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19440.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may enter into agreements with the authority and any other private, state, or federal entity that is responsible for administering the federal Horseracing Integrity and Safety Act of 2020 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3051 et seq.) for the purpose of providing services consistent with the enforcement of the horseracing antidoping and medication control program and the racetrack safety program, as authorized by Section 3054(e)(2) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(2) Upon entering into an agreement pursuant to paragraph (1), the board’s employees and contractors are authorized to provide all services contracted for under the agreement, including, but not limited to, representation
 in any administrative adjudicative enforcement proceeding, and general enforcement of the authority’s horseracing antidoping and medication control program and racetrack safety program.

(3) An agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not be subject to state contracting laws or Department of General Services review or approval.

(b) On behalf of the authority, the board may collect and remit fees assessed by the authority to fund California’s proportionate share of the authority’s horseracing antidoping and medication control program and racetrack safety program, as authorized by Section 3052(f) of Title 15 of the United States Code. If the board elects to collect and remit fees on behalf of the authority, the board shall allocate, assess, and collect the fees assessed by the authority from those associations and fairs subject to the authority’s jurisdiction in either
 of the following manners:

(1) From the remaining market access fees addressed by paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 19604, pursuant to the process described in subparagraph (E) of that paragraph.

(2) As part of the license fee established by Section 19616.51 using the methodology described in that section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may elect to subject breeds other than thoroughbreds to the federal Horseracing Integrity and Safety Act of 2020 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3051 et seq.), as authorized by Section 3054(l) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “the authority” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3051 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 2.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

19440.5.

An annual audit shall be conducted of the financial books and records of the horsemen’s organizations, including any subsidiaries of the horsemen’s organizations, by a nationally recognized accounting firm as follows:

(a) With respect to pension funds received by those organizations pursuant to Sections 19533, 19613, and 19613.1, the audit shall be conducted within 90 days of the close of the fund’s business year. The audit shall cover the period of time since the last audit, and a copy thereof shall be filed with the board, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Governmental Organization.
